Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1553
Federal or state earned income tax credit refund; when exempt.

In bankruptcy and in the collection of a money judgment, the full amount of any federal or state earned income tax credit refund shall be exempt from attachment, garnishment, or other legal or equitable process and from all claims of creditors.

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 6.